Maryland, session 2025, HB1476.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
3–106.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PUBLIC BODY” MEANS:
(1) THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT;
(2) THE STATE;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1476*

HOUSE BILL 1476
(3) A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE;
(4) AN ENTITY CREATED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY; OR
(5) AN INSTRUMENTALITY OR UNIT OF THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT,
THE STATE, OR A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE.
(B) AN EMPLOYER MAY NOT DISCLOSE OR THREATEN TO DISCLOSE TO A
PUBLIC BODY AN EMPLOYEE’S IMMIGRATION STATUS FOR THE PURPOSE OF
CONCEALING AN EMPLOYER’S VIOLATION OF:
(1) THE MARYLAND WAGE AND HOUR LAW;
(2) THE MARYLAND WAGE PAYMENT AND COLLECTION LAW;
(3) SUBTITLE 9 OF THIS TITLE;
(4) THE MARYLAND HEALTHY WORKING FAMILIES ACT;
(5) THE MARYLAND UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE LAW;
(6) THE MARYLAND FAMILY AND MEDICAL LEAVE INSURANCE
PROGRAM;
(7) THE MARYLAND WORKERS’ COMPENSATION ACT;
(8) § 5–305 OR § 7–714 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE;
(9) TITLE 17, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE;
(10) TITLE 18 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE;
OR
(11) TITLE 10 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(C) THE COMMISSIONER:
(1) MAY INVESTIGATE A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION ON THE
COMMISSIONER’S OWN INITIATIVE OR ON RECEIPT OF A WRITTEN COMPLAINT; AND

HOUSE BILL 1476 3
(2) SHALL CONDUCT THE INVESTIGATION AND ENFORCEMENT OF A
VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS
SECTION.
(D) (1) WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER THE RECEIPT OF A WRITTEN COMPLAINT,
THE COMMISSIONER SHALL CONDUCT AN INVESTIGATION AND ATTEMPT TO
RESOLVE THE ISSUE INFORMALLY THROUGH MEDIATION.
(2) IF THE COMMISSIONER IS UNABLE TO RESOLVE AN ISSUE
THROUGH MEDIATION DURING THE PERIOD STATED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION AND THE COMMISSIONER DETERMINES THAT THE EMPLOYER HAS
COMMITTED A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL ASSESS A
CIVIL PENALTY:
(I) NOT TO EXCEED $1,000 FOR A FIRST VIOLATION;
(II) NOT TO EXCEED $5,000 FOR A SECOND VIOLATION; AND
(III) NOT TO EXCEED $10,000 FOR A THIRD OR SUBSEQUENT
VIOLATION.
(3) IN DETERMINING THE AMOUNT OF A CIVIL PENALTY TO BE
IMPOSED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL CONSIDER:
(I) THE EMPLOYER’S HISTORY OF VIOLATIONS;
(II) THE SERIOUSNESS OF THE VIOLATION;
(III) THE EMPLOYER’S GOOD FAITH IN COMPLYING WITH THIS
SECTION; AND
(IV) THE SIZE OF THE EMPLOYER’S BUSINESS.
(4) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (5) OF THIS
SUBSECTION:
1. WITHIN 15 DAYS AFTER AN EMPLOYER RECEIVES A
NOTICE TO PAY A CIVIL PENALTY UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
EMPLOYER MAY REQUEST AN ADMINISTRATIVE HEARING, SUBJECT TO THE
REQUIREMENTS OF TITLE 10, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE;
AND

HOUSE BILL 1476
2. IF NO HEARING IS REQUESTED UNDER ITEM 1 OF THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH WITHIN 15 DAYS AFTER THE EMPLOYER’S RECEIPT OF THE NOTICE,
THE ORDER TO PAY A CIVIL PENALTY BECOMES A FINAL ORDER OF THE
COMMISSIONER.
(II) PAYMENT OF A CIVIL PENALTY UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH IS
DUE WHEN THE FINAL ORDER IS ISSUED OR THE NOTICE BECOMES THE FINAL
ORDER.
(5) FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION INVOLVING A VIOLATION OF
THE MARYLAND UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE LAW:
(I) AN EMPLOYER MAY REQUEST A HEARING UNDER § 8–806 OF
THIS ARTICLE; AND
(II) ANY CIVIL PENALTY IMPOSED FOLLOWING A HEARING
SHALL BE DUE WHEN ASSESSMENTS FOR CONTRIBUTION, REIMBURSEMENT
PAYMENT, OR INTEREST ARE DUE UNDER § 8–629 OF THIS ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.